Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2736
Registration in beneficiary form; applicable law.

A security may be registered in beneficiary form if the form is authorized by sections 30-2734 to 30-2745 or a similar statute of the state of organization of the issuer or registering entity, the location of the registering entity's principal office, the office of its transfer agent or its office making the registration, or by sections 30-2734 to 30-2745 or a similar statute of the law of the state listed as the owner's address at the time of registration. A registration governed by the law of a jurisdiction in which sections 30-2735 to 30-2745 or similar legislation is not in force or was not in force when a registration in beneficiary form was made is nevertheless presumed to be valid and authorized as a matter of contract law.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 22.